Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2517
Committees; meetings.

(1) The board may create an executive committee the composition of which shall be set forth in the joint public agency's rules of governance. The executive committee shall have and exercise the power and authority of the board during intervals between the board's meetings in accordance with the rules of governance, motions, or resolutions creating the executive committee. The terms of office of the members of the executive committee and the method of filling vacancies shall be fixed by the rules of governance.

(2) The board may also create one or more committees to which the board may delegate such powers and duties as the board shall specify. In no event shall any committee be empowered to authorize the issuance of bonds. The membership and voting requirements for action by a committee shall be specified by the board.

(3) The board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 5.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.